test/src/morphology/noun-paradis_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup


# Comments after each noun:
# ok = checked against 
# ? = not checked

# Odd-syllable nouns, without those only in plural. The nouns to nomen derivations are also tested. Lexicon ÅRES,GÁMAS, SÅHKÅR, GAHPER, BENA, BAVSEV, GÅRDAL, RÁBEV, SEKKAS, DERDAJ, BØSOJ, GUOVSOJVUOJOJ, RITJAS, TJÅLKES, VÁJES, BÁRNEP, SÁGAS, SÁGE, BUTJES

Tests:
  Noun - boagos: # ÅRES
    boagos+N+Sg+Nom: boagos 
    boagos+N+Sg+Gen: båhkusa
    boagos+N+Sg+Gen+PxDu1: båhkusimme
    boagos+N+Sg+Acc: båhkusav
    boagos+N+Sg+Ine: båhkusin 
    boagos+N+Sg+Ill: båhkusij
    boagos+N+Sg+Ela: båhkusis
    boagos+N+Sg+Com: båhkusijn 
    boagos+N+Pl+Nom: båhkusa
    boagos+N+Pl+Gen: båhkusij
    boagos+N+Pl+Acc: båhkusijt
    boagos+N+Pl+Ine: båhkusijn
    boagos+N+Pl+Ill: båhkusijda
    boagos+N+Pl+Ill+PxPl2: båhkusijdasihtte 
    boagos+N+Pl+Ela: båhkusijs
    boagos+N+Pl+Com: båhkusij
    boagos+N+Ess: [båhkusin, boagon]
    boagos+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: båhkusasj
    boagos+N+Der/Dimin+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: båhkusattjasj
    boagos+N+Der/ahtes+A+Sg+Nom: båhkusahtá
    boagos+N+Der/ahtes+A+Der/at+Adv: båhkusahtá
    boagos+N+Der/dibme+A+Sg+Nom: []
    boagos+N+Abe: []

  Noun - buonjos: # ÅRES
    buonjos+N+Sg+Nom: buonjos
    buonjos+N+Sg+Acc: buodnjusav
    buonjos+N+Sg+Com: buodnjusijn
    buonjos+N+Ess: [buonjon, buodnjusin]
    buonjos+N+Der/ahtes+A+Sg+Nom: buodnjusahtá

  Noun - bálos: # ÅRES
    bálos+N+Sg+Nom: bálos
    bálos+N+Sg+Acc: bállusav
    bálos+N+Pl+Com: bállusij
    bálos+N+Ess: [bálon, bállusin]

  Noun - båros: # ÅRES
    båros+N+Sg+Nom: båros 
    båros+N+Sg+Ill: bårrusij 

  Noun - dieres: # ÅRES
    dieres+N+Sg+Nom: dieres 
    dieres+N+Sg+Ine: dærrásin
    dieres+N+Sg+Ill: dærrásij
    dieres+N+Der/ahtes+A+Sg+Nom: dærrásahtá

  Noun - duber: # ÅRES
    duber+N+Sg+Nom: duber 
    duber+N+Sg+Gen: duhpára 
    duber+N+Sg+Ill: duhpárij
    duber+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: duhpárasj
    duber+N+Der/Dimin+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: duhpárattjasj
    duber+N+Der/ahtes+A+Sg+Nom: duhpárahtá
    duber+N+Der/ahtes+A+Der/at+Adv: duhpárahtá
    duber+N+Abe: []

  Noun - gielov: # ÅRES
    gielov+N+Sg+Nom: gielov 
    gielov+N+Sg+Ine: giellumin
    gielov+N+Sg+Ill: giellumij

  Noun - gietjesj: # ÅRES
    gietjesj+N+Sg+Nom: gietjesj
    gietjesj+N+Sg+Ine: gætjátjin
    gietjesj+N+Sg+Ill: gætjátjij

  Noun - gæsás: #  GÁMAS
    gæsás+N+Sg+Nom: gæsás
    gæsás+N+Sg+Ine: gæssásin
    gæsás+N+Sg+Ill: gæssásij
    gæsás+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: gæssásasj
    gæsás+N+Der/Dimin+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: gæssásattjasj
    gæsás+N+Der/ahtes+A+Sg+Nom: gæssásahtá
    gæsás+N+Der/ahtes+A+Der/at+Adv: gæssásahtá
    gæsás+N+Abe: []

  Noun - tjuorvas: # GÁMAS
    tjuorvas+N+Sg+Nom: tjuorvas 
    tjuorvas+N+Sg+Ill: tjuorvvasij
    tjuorvas+N+Pl+Nom: tjuorvvasa

  Noun - huvkas: # GÁMAS
    huvkas+N+Sg+Nom: huvkas 
    huvkas+N+Sg+Ine: huvkkasin 
    huvkas+N+Sg+Ill: huvkkasij

  Noun - germaj: # GÁMAS
    germaj+N+Sg+Nom: germaj 
    germaj+N+Sg+Gen: gærmmaha
    germaj+N+Sg+Gen+PxDu1: gærmmahimme
    germaj+N+Sg+Acc: gærmmahav
    germaj+N+Sg+Ine: gærmmahin 
    germaj+N+Sg+Ill: gærmmahij
    germaj+N+Sg+Ela: gærmmahis
    germaj+N+Sg+Com: gærmmahijn 
    germaj+N+Pl+Nom: gærmmaha
    germaj+N+Pl+Gen: gærmmahij
    germaj+N+Pl+Acc: gærmmahijt
    germaj+N+Pl+Ine: gærmmahijn
    germaj+N+Pl+Ill: gærmmahijda
    germaj+N+Pl+Ill+PxPl2: gærmmahijdasihtte 
    germaj+N+Pl+Ela: gærmmahijs
    germaj+N+Pl+Com: gærmmahij
    germaj+N+Ess: [gærmmahin, german]
    germaj+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: gærmmahasj

  Noun - hávstar: # GÁMAS
    hávstar+N+Sg+Nom: hávstar 
    hávstar+N+Sg+Ine: hávsstarin 
    hávstar+N+Sg+Ill: hávsstarij

  Noun - luoppal: # GÁMAS
    luoppal+N+Sg+Nom: luoppal 
    luoppal+N+Sg+Ine: luobbalin 
    luoppal+N+Sg+Ill: luobbalij

  Noun - lárkav: # GÁMAS
    lárkav+N+Sg+Nom: lárkav 
    lárkav+N+Sg+Ine: lárkkamin 
    lárkav+N+Sg+Ill: lárkkamij

  Noun - ganjál: # GÁMAS
    ganjál+N+Sg+Nom: ganjál
    ganjál+N+Sg+Gen: gadnjala
    ganjál+N+Sg+Gen+PxDu1: gadnjalimme
    ganjál+N+Sg+Acc: gadnjalav
    ganjál+N+Sg+Ine: gadnjalin 
    ganjál+N+Sg+Ill: gadnjalij
    ganjál+N+Sg+Ela: gadnjalis
    ganjál+N+Sg+Com: gadnjalijn 
    ganjál+N+Pl+Nom: gadnjala
    ganjál+N+Pl+Gen: gadnjalij
    ganjál+N+Pl+Acc: gadnjalijt
    ganjál+N+Pl+Ine: gadnjalijn
    ganjál+N+Pl+Ill: gadnjalijda
    ganjál+N+Pl+Ill+PxPl2: gadnjalijdasihtte 
    ganjál+N+Pl+Ela: gadnjalijs
    ganjál+N+Pl+Com: gadnjalij
    ganjál+N+Ess: gadnjalin
    ganjál+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: gadnjalasj
    ganjál+N+Der/Dimin+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: gadnjalattjasj
    ganjál+N+Der/ahtes+A+Sg+Nom: gadnjalahtá
    ganjál+N+Der/ahtes+A+Attr: gadnjalahtes
    ganjál+N+Der/ahtes+A+Der/at+Adv: gadnjalahtá
    ganjál+N+Der/dibme+A+Sg+Nom: []
    ganjál+N+Abe: []

  Noun - návdár: # SÅHKÅR
    návdár+N+Sg+Nom: návdár 
    návdár+N+Sg+Ine: návddárin 
    návdár+N+Sg+Ill: návddárij
    návdár+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: návddárasj
    návdár+N+Der/Dimin+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: návddárattjasj
    návdár+N+Der/ahtes+A+Sg+Nom: návddárahtá
    návdár+N+Der/ahtes+A+Der/at+Adv: návddárahtá
    návdár+N+Abe: []

  Noun - pihper: # SÅHKÅR
    pihper+N+Sg+Nom: pihper 
    pihper+N+Sg+Ine: pihppárin 
    pihper+N+Sg+Ill: pihppárij

  Noun - stájnar: # SÅHKÅR
    stájnar+N+Sg+Nom: stájnar 
    stájnar+N+Sg+Ine: stájnnarin 
    stájnar+N+Sg+Ill: stájnnarij

  Noun - tjieller: # SÅHKÅR
    tjieller+N+Sg+Nom: tjieller 
    tjieller+N+Sg+Ine: tjællárin
    tjieller+N+Sg+Ill: tjællárij

  Noun - adám: # GAHPER
    adám+N+Sg+Nom: adám 
    adám+N+Sg+Ine: adámin 
    adám+N+Sg+Ill: adámij
    adám+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: adámasj
    adám+N+Der/Dimin+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: adámattjasj
    adám+N+Der/ahtes+A+Sg+Nom: adámahtá
    adám+N+Der/ahtes+A+Der/at+Adv: adámahtá
    adám+N+Abe: []

  Noun - albasj: # GAHPER
    albasj+N+Sg+Nom: albasj 
    albasj+N+Sg+Ine: albatjin 
    albasj+N+Sg+Ill: albatjij

  Noun - ulmusj: # GAHPER
    ulmusj+N+Sg+Nom: ulmusj 
    ulmusj+N+Sg+Ine: ulmutjin 
    ulmusj+N+Sg+Ill: ulmutjij

  Noun - berun: # GAHPER
    berun+N+Sg+Nom: berun 
    berun+N+Sg+Ine: berunin 
    berun+N+Sg+Ill: berunij

  Noun - båndor: # SÅHKÅR
    båndor+N+Sg+Nom: båndor
    båndor+N+Sg+Gen: bånndura
    båndor+N+Sg+Gen+PxDu1: bånndurimme
    båndor+N+Sg+Acc: bånndurav
    båndor+N+Sg+Ine: bånndurin 
    båndor+N+Sg+Ill: bånndurij
    båndor+N+Sg+Ela: bånnduris
    båndor+N+Sg+Com: bånndurijn 
    båndor+N+Pl+Nom: bånndura
    båndor+N+Pl+Gen: bånndurij
    båndor+N+Pl+Acc: bånndurijt
    båndor+N+Pl+Ine: bånndurijn
    båndor+N+Pl+Ill: bånndurijda
    båndor+N+Pl+Ill+PxPl2: bånndurijdasihtte 
    båndor+N+Pl+Ela: bånndurijs
    båndor+N+Pl+Com: bånndurij
    båndor+N+Ess: bånndurin
    båndor+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: bånndurasj
    båndor+N+Der/Dimin+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: bånndurattjasj
    båndor+N+Der/ahtes+A+Sg+Nom: bånndurahtá
    båndor+N+Der/ahtes+A+Attr: bånndurahtes
    båndor+N+Der/ahtes+A+Der/at+Adv: bånndurahtá
    båndor+N+Der/dibme+A+Sg+Nom: []
    båndor+N+Abe: []

  Noun - beraj: # GÁMAS
    beraj+N+Sg+Nom: beraj
    beraj+N+Sg+Gen: berraha
    beraj+N+Sg+Gen+PxDu1: berrahimme
    beraj+N+Sg+Acc: berrahav
    beraj+N+Sg+Ine: berrahin 
    beraj+N+Sg+Ill: berrahij
    beraj+N+Sg+Ela: berrahis
    beraj+N+Sg+Com: berrahijn 
    beraj+N+Pl+Nom: berraha
    beraj+N+Pl+Gen: berrahij
    beraj+N+Pl+Acc: berrahijt
    beraj+N+Pl+Ine: berrahijn
    beraj+N+Pl+Ill: berrahijda
    beraj+N+Pl+Ill+PxPl2: berrahijdasihtte 
    beraj+N+Pl+Ela: berrahijs
    beraj+N+Pl+Com: berrahij
    beraj+N+Ess: berrahin
    beraj+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: berrahasj
    beraj+N+Der/Dimin+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: berrahattjasj
    beraj+N+Der/ahtes+A+Sg+Nom: berrahahtá
    beraj+N+Der/ahtes+A+Attr: berrahahtes
    beraj+N+Der/ahtes+A+Der/at+Adv: berrahahtá
    beraj+N+Der/dibme+A+Sg+Nom: []
    beraj+N+Abe: []

  Noun - álmmuk: # GAHPER
    álmmuk+N+Sg+Nom: álmmuk
    álmmuk+N+Sg+Gen: álmmuga
    álmmuk+N+Sg+Gen+PxDu1: álmmugimme
    álmmuk+N+Sg+Acc: álmmugav
    álmmuk+N+Sg+Ine: álmmugin 
    álmmuk+N+Sg+Ill: álmmugij
    álmmuk+N+Sg+Ela: álmmugis
    álmmuk+N+Sg+Com: álmmugijn 
    álmmuk+N+Pl+Nom: álmmuga
    álmmuk+N+Pl+Gen: álmmugij
    álmmuk+N+Pl+Acc: álmmugijt
    álmmuk+N+Pl+Ine: álmmugijn
    álmmuk+N+Pl+Ill: álmmugijda
    álmmuk+N+Pl+Ill+PxPl2: álmmugijdasihtte 
    álmmuk+N+Pl+Ela: álmmugijs
    álmmuk+N+Pl+Com: álmmugij
    álmmuk+N+Ess: álmmugin
    álmmuk+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: álmmugasj
    álmmuk+N+Der/Dimin+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: álmmugattjasj
    álmmuk+N+Der/ahtes+A+Sg+Nom: álmmugahtá
    álmmuk+N+Der/ahtes+A+Attr: álmmugahtes
    álmmuk+N+Der/ahtes+A+Der/at+Adv: álmmugahtá
    álmmuk+N+Der/dibme+A+Sg+Nom: []
    álmmuk+N+Abe: []

  Noun - garŋŋel: # GAHPER
    garŋŋel+N+Sg+Nom: garŋŋel
    garŋŋel+N+Sg+Gen: garŋŋela
    garŋŋel+N+Sg+Gen+PxDu1: garŋŋelimme
    garŋŋel+N+Sg+Acc: garŋŋelav
    garŋŋel+N+Sg+Ine: garŋŋelin 
    garŋŋel+N+Sg+Ill: garŋŋelij
    garŋŋel+N+Sg+Ela: garŋŋelis
    garŋŋel+N+Sg+Com: garŋŋelijn 
    garŋŋel+N+Pl+Nom: garŋŋela
    garŋŋel+N+Pl+Gen: garŋŋelij
    garŋŋel+N+Pl+Acc: garŋŋelijt
    garŋŋel+N+Pl+Ine: garŋŋelijn
    garŋŋel+N+Pl+Ill: garŋŋelijda
    garŋŋel+N+Pl+Ill+PxPl2: garŋŋelijdasihtte 
    garŋŋel+N+Pl+Ela: garŋŋelijs
    garŋŋel+N+Pl+Com: garŋŋelij
    garŋŋel+N+Ess: garŋŋelin
    garŋŋel+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: garŋŋelasj
    garŋŋel+N+Der/Dimin+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: garŋŋelattjasj
    garŋŋel+N+Der/ahtes+A+Sg+Nom: garŋŋelahtá
    garŋŋel+N+Der/ahtes+A+Attr: garŋŋelahtes
    garŋŋel+N+Der/ahtes+A+Der/at+Adv: garŋŋelahtá
    garŋŋel+N+Der/dibme+A+Sg+Nom: []
    garŋŋel+N+Abe: []

  Noun - miedem: # GAHPER
    miedem+N+Sg+Nom: miedem
    miedem+N+Sg+Gen: miedema
    miedem+N+Sg+Gen+PxDu1: miedemimme
    miedem+N+Sg+Acc: miedemav
    miedem+N+Sg+Ine: miedemin 
    miedem+N+Sg+Ill: miedemij
    miedem+N+Sg+Ela: miedemis
    miedem+N+Sg+Com: miedemijn 
    miedem+N+Pl+Nom: miedema
    miedem+N+Pl+Gen: miedemij
    miedem+N+Pl+Acc: miedemijt
    miedem+N+Pl+Ine: miedemijn
    miedem+N+Pl+Ill: miedemijda
    miedem+N+Pl+Ill+PxPl2: miedemijdasihtte 
    miedem+N+Pl+Ela: miedemijs
    miedem+N+Pl+Com: miedemij
    miedem+N+Ess: miedemin
    miedem+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: miedemasj
    miedem+N+Der/Dimin+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: miedemattjasj
    miedem+N+Der/ahtes+A+Sg+Nom: miedemahtá
    miedem+N+Der/ahtes+A+Attr: miedemahtes
    miedem+N+Der/ahtes+A+Der/at+Adv: miedemahtá
    miedem+N+Der/dibme+A+Sg+Nom: []
    miedem+N+Abe: []

  Noun - idet: # GAHPER
    idet+N+Sg+Nom: idet
    idet+N+Sg+Gen: ideda
    idet+N+Sg+Gen+PxDu1: idedimme
    idet+N+Sg+Acc: idedav
    idet+N+Sg+Ine: idedin 
    idet+N+Sg+Ill: idedij
    idet+N+Sg+Ela: idedis
    idet+N+Sg+Com: idedijn 
    idet+N+Pl+Nom: ideda
    idet+N+Pl+Gen: idedij
    idet+N+Pl+Acc: idedijt
    idet+N+Pl+Ine: idedijn
    idet+N+Pl+Ill: idedijda
    idet+N+Pl+Ill+PxPl2: idedijdasihtte 
    idet+N+Pl+Ela: idedijs
    idet+N+Pl+Com: idedij
    idet+N+Ess: idedin
    idet+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: idedasj
    idet+N+Der/Dimin+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: idedattjasj
    idet+N+Der/ahtes+A+Sg+Nom: idedahtá
    idet+N+Der/ahtes+A+Attr: idedahtes
    idet+N+Der/ahtes+A+Der/at+Adv: idedahtá
    idet+N+Der/dibme+A+Sg+Nom: []
    idet+N+Abe: []
